Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3639.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3639.1. A. No insurer shall cancel, refuse to renew or
increase the premium of a homeowner's insurance policy or any other
personal residential insurance coverage, which has been in effect
more than forty-five (45) days, solely because the insured filed a
first claim against the policy. The provisions of this section
shall not be construed to prevent the cancellation, nonrenewal or
Req. No. 15838 Page 1

incr ease in premium of a homeowner's insurance policy for the
following reasons:
1. Nonpayment of premium;
2. Discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation in the
procurement of the insurance or with respect to any claims submitted
thereunder;
3. Discovery of willful or reckless acts or omissions on the
part of the named insured which increase any hazard insured against;
4. A change in the risk which substantially increases any
hazard insured against after insurance coverage has been issued or
renewed;
5. Violation of any local fire, health, safety, building, or
construction regulation or ordinance with respect to any insured
property or the occupancy thereof which substantially increases any
hazard insured against;
6. A determination by the Insurance Commissioner that the
continuation of the policy would place the insurer in violation of
the insurance laws of this state; or
7. Conviction of the named insured of a crime having as one of
its necessary elements an act increasing any hazard insured against.
B. An insurer shall give to the named insured at the mailing
address shown on a homeowner's policy, a written renewal notice that
shall include new premium, new deductible, new limits or coverage at
least thirty (30) days prior to the expiration date of the policy.
Req. No. 15838 Page 2

If t he insurer fails to provide such notice, the premium,
deductible, limits and coverage provided to the named insurer prior
to the change shall remain in effect until notice is given or until
the effective date of replacement coverage obtained by the named
insured, whichever occurs first. If notice is given by mail, the
notice shall be deemed to have been given on the day the notice is
mailed. If the insured elects not to renew, any earned premium for
the period of extension of the terminated policy shall be calculated
pro rata at the lower of the current or previous year's rate. If
the insured accepts the renewal, the premium increase, if any, and
other changes shall be effective the day following the prior
policy's expiration or anniversary date.
C. In the event an insured cancels a homeowner's insurance
policy or any other personal residential insurance coverage, written
notice shall be provided by the insured to the insurer that provided
the coverage being canceled. The notice of cancellation shall
provide the date of the cancellation of the policy and the insurer
shall reimburse the insured for any premiums paid for coverage
beyond the date of cancellation of the policy.
D. An insurer canceling a policy under subsection C of this
section shall not be liable for claims arising after the date of
cancellation.


Req. No. 15838 Page 3

E. Beginning November 1, 2026, and every year thereafter,
annual homeowner's policy renewal premium increases shall be capped
at a maximum of ten (10%) percent.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15838 MJ 12/18/25


















Req. No. 15838 Page 4